Missouri, session 2026, HB3409.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 261, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto eleven new sections, to
be known as sections 261.150, 261.152, 261.154, 261.156, 261.158, 261.160, 261.162,
261.164, 261.166, 261.168, and 261.170, to read as follows:
261.150. Sections 261.150 to 261.170 shall be known and may be cited as the
"Missouri Agricultural Data Ownership and Market Competition Act".
261.152. As used in sections 261.150 to 261.170, the following terms mean:
(1) "Agricultural data", any information in any format that is generated from,
derived from, or relates to agricultural production operations, agricultural equipment
operations, or agricultural land including, but not limited to:
(a) Yield data, soil data, crop data, and field data;
(b) Precision agriculture data including GPS coordinates, application rates, and
prescription maps;
(c) Equipment operational data, diagnostic data, telematics data, and machine
performance data;
(d) Livestock data including health records, production metrics, breeding data,
and performance analytics;
(e) Weather data, environmental data, and climate data specific to agricultural
operations not otherwise publicly available;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3409 2
(f) Input data including seed, fertilizer, pesticide, herbicide, Diesel Emission
Fluid (DEF), and fuel usage data;
(g) Financial data specific to agricultural production operations; and
(h) Agronomic analyses, predictive models, and benchmarking reports derived
from the foregoing data;
(2) "Agricultural equipment", any equipment used in agricultural production
operations that generates, collects, transmits, stores, or processes agricultural data;
(3) "Agricultural producer", a person or entity engaged in agricultural
production operations as a landowner, tenant farmer, contract grower, livestock owner,
or other agricultural operator;
(4) "Agricultural production operations", any activity conducted for the
purpose of producing agricultural commodities including crop production, livestock
production, aquaculture, horticulture, viticulture, and similar activities;
(5) "County data market share", the percentage of total agricultural data
collected from agricultural producers within a single county of Missouri by a data
collector or its affiliates;
(6) "Data aggregator", a person or entity that collects, compiles, or processes
agricultural data from multiple agricultural producers for the purpose of analysis, sale,
licensing, or other commercial use;
(7) "Data collector", a person or entity that collects, receives, accesses,
transmits, stores, or processes agricultural data, including original equipment
manufacturers, platform providers, service providers, and data aggregators;
(8) "Data owner", a person or entity who holds ownership rights in agricultural
data as determined under section 261.154;
(9) "Data transaction", any sale, license, transfer, or other commercial exchange
of agricultural data or rights therein;
(10) "Department", the department of agriculture;
(11) "Fair and reasonable terms", terms and conditions for data transactions
that:
(a) Are transparent and clearly disclosed;
(b) Do not impose costs that unreasonably exceed the actual costs of providing
the data or services;
(c) Do not include terms that are discriminatory, predatory, or that
unreasonably restrict the data owner's rights; and
(d) Provide the data owner with adequate compensation reflecting the value of
the data;

HB 3409 3
(12) "Independent data service provider", a person or entity that provides
agricultural data services including data analysis, storage, management, or
monetization services that are not provided by an original equipment manufacturer
or an affiliate of an original equipment manufacturer;
(13) "Landowner", a person or entity that holds a fee simple, life estate, or other
possessory interest in agricultural land;
(14) "Livestock owner", a person or entity that holds ownership rights in
livestock;
(15) "Original equipment manufacturer", a person or entity that manufactures
agricultural equipment or licenses for the use of its brand name for agricultural
equipment manufactured by others;
(16) "Platform provider", a person or entity that operates a digital platform,
application, or service through which agricultural data is collected, stored, transmitted,
processed, or made available;
(17) "Transformed data", agricultural data that has been processed, analyzed,
aggregated, or otherwise transformed through the application of proprietary
algorithms, analytical methods, or creative processes to produce copyrightable works
including agronomic analyses, predictive models, field prescriptions, comparative
benchmarking reports, or validated farming practices.
261.154. 1. Unless otherwise provided by written agreement between the
parties:
(1) Agricultural data generated from crop production operations belongs to the
landowner of the agricultural land on which the data was generated, whether the
landowner farms the land directly or leases it to tenant farmers;
(2) Agricultural data generated from livestock operations belongs to the
livestock owner, regardless of where the livestock is housed or who manages the
livestock;
(3) Data generated by agricultural equipment during agricultural production
operations belongs to the owner or lessee of the equipment at the time the data was
generated; and
(4) When agricultural data is transformed into copyrightable works through the
application of proprietary algorithms, analytical methods, or creative processes, the
data owner who provided the underlying raw data retains an ownership interest in the
transformed data proportional to the contribution of their raw data to the
transformation.
2. No browsewrap agreement, clickwrap agreement, terms of service, end-user
license agreement, or similar instrument shall be effective to transfer or waive a data

HB 3409 4
owner's rights under sections 261.150 to 261.170 unless the data owner has provided
express, informed, written consent specifically acknowledging the transfer or waiver of
such rights.
3. Nothing in this section shall prevent parties from negotiating alternative data
ownership arrangements through written contract. Agricultural producers may
negotiate data ownership and revenue-sharing arrangements based on their specific
circumstances including, but not limited to, tenant farming arrangements,
sharecropping arrangements, contract growing operations, custom farming
operations, and equipment leasing arrangements.
261.156. 1. A data collector that collects, receives, or accesses agricultural data
from an agricultural producer shall:
(1) Provide clear, conspicuous, and complete disclosure of:
(a) The types of agricultural data being collected;
(b) The purposes for which the data will be used;
(c) The third parties with whom the data has been or may be shared, sold, or
licensed;
(d) The data owner's rights under sections 261.150 to 261.170; and
(e) The estimated commercial value of the data being collected, if known or
reasonably ascertainable;
(2) Obtain express, informed consent from the data owner prior to collecting,
using, or sharing the data including, but not limited to, data collected for the past five
years;
(3) Provide the data owner with a copy of all data collected in a standardized,
portable, machine-readable format upon request for the past five years from the date
requested;
(4) Fully delete the data owner's data upon written request, except to the extent
retention is required under federal or state law; and
(5) Provide a written, legally binding certification of the deletion upon request.
2. A data collector shall offer agricultural producers access to their own data on
fair and reasonable terms, which shall not:
(1) Impose fees that unreasonably exceed the actual costs of providing the data;
(2) Condition access to equipment, services, or functionality on the producer's
consent to data collection or sharing beyond what is necessary for the requested service;
(3) Impose discriminatory terms based on the producer's data sharing decisions;
or
(4) Restrict the producer's ability to share their data with independent data
service providers of their choosing either directly or indirectly.

HB 3409 5
3. A data collector shall provide agricultural producers with the ability to export
their data in standardized, interoperable formats that allow the data to be used with
systems and services provided by independent data service providers.
261.158. 1. For purposes of this section:
(1) Affiliates of a data collector shall include any entity that directly or indirectly
controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the data collector;
(2) Agricultural production acreage shall be determined using data from the
United States Department of Agriculture Census of Agriculture, or similar authoritative
source;
(3) Agricultural production of livestock shall be determined by the herd count
divided by the annual number of animals harvested for each species.
2. No data collector, together with its affiliates, shall collect agricultural data
from agricultural producers representing more than twenty-five percent of the total
agricultural production acreage within any single county of Missouri and based upon
the number of animals harvested annually.
3. A data collector that collects agricultural data from producers in Missouri
shall:
(1) Report annually to the department the total agricultural acreage and
harvested animals represented by the producers from whom it collects data in each
county; and
(2) Maintain records sufficient to verify compliance with this section for a period
of not less than five years.
4. The agricultural market data concentration limits set forth in this section
shall not apply to data collection conducted by:
(1) A governmental entity for regulatory, research, or statistical purposes;
(2) A land-grant university or agricultural research institution for bona fide
research purposes; or
(3) An agricultural cooperative owned and controlled by agricultural producers,
provided that the data is used solely for the benefit of the cooperative's members and
not resold.
5. A data collector that violates the provisions of this section shall:
(1) Within ninety days of becoming aware of or being notified of the violation by
the department or attorney general, divest data-collection activities within that county
and delete the excess data that would be sufficient to bring the data collector into
compliance; or
(2) Be subject to the provisions of section 261.164.
6. The provisions of this section shall become effective on July 1, 2027.

HB 3409 6
261.160. 1. An agricultural producer shall have the right to monetize their
agricultural data by selling, licensing, or otherwise commercializing such data, either
directly or through an independent data service provider or data aggregator of their
choosing.
2. A data collector shall not:
(1) Prevent, restrict, or impede an agricultural producer from monetizing their
data through third parties;
(2) Impose contractual provisions that grant the data collector exclusive rights to
the producer's data; or
(3) Discriminate against a producer in terms, pricing, or service based on the
producer's exercise of data monetization rights.
3. When agricultural data is sold, licensed, or otherwise commercialized by a
data collector or data aggregator:
(1) The data owner shall be entitled to receive fair compensation for the use of
their data, which shall be disclosed prior to the data transaction;
(2) The data collector or aggregator shall provide the data owner with a
transparent accounting of all data transactions involving the owner's data upon request;
and
(3) Revenue-sharing arrangements shall be established through a written
agreement between the parties which shall specify the percentage or amount of revenue
to be paid to the data owner.
4. An agricultural producer who develops innovative farming methodologies,
systems, or practices that demonstrably improve agricultural outcomes shall have the
right to:
(1) Transform such methodologies into copyrightable intellectual property
through documentation and validation using operational data;
(2) License or sell such validated farming practices to other agricultural
producers or entities; and
(3) Receive royalties or other compensation for the use of such validated farming
practices.
261.162. 1. Data transactions involving agricultural data that occur within
Missouri or involve Missouri agricultural producers shall be subject to state sales tax as
provided in chapter 144.
2. A data collector or data aggregator that facilitates data transactions involving
agricultural data shall:
(1) Calculate and collect applicable sales taxes on data transactions;

HB 3409 7
(2) Remit collected taxes to the Missouri department of revenue under
applicable law; and
(3) Provide data owners with documentation of taxes collected on data
transactions involving their data.
3. The following data transactions shall be exempt from sales tax under this
section:
(1) Data transactions conducted for bona fide research purposes by land-grant
universities or agricultural research institutions;
(2) Data transactions conducted by governmental entities for regulatory or
statistical purposes; and
(3) Data transactions within agricultural cooperatives that are solely for the
benefit of cooperative members.
4. All moneys collected under this section shall be deposited to the credit of the
general revenue fund and shall be appropriated as provided by law.
5. The department in consultation with the department of revenue shall
promulgate rules necessary to implement the provisions of this section including, but not
limited to, rules relating to the following:
(1) Valuation methods for agricultural data transactions;
(2) Reporting requirements for data collectors and aggregators; and
(3) Procedures for tax collection and remittance.
6. The provisions of this section shall become effective on July 1, 2027.
261.164. 1. A violation of any provisions or requirement of sections 261.150 to
261.170 shall be deemed a violation of section 407.020, and any person violating such
provisions or requirement shall be subject to all penalties, remedies, and procedures
provided in sections 407.010 to 407.145. The attorney general shall have all powers,
rights, and duties regarding violations of sections 261.150 to 261.170 as are provided in
sections 407.010 to 407.145.
2. A data collector who violates the provisions of sections 261.150 to 261.170
shall be subject to a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed fifty thousand dollars per
violation. Each day of continuing violation shall constitute a separate offense. The
remedies under this subsection shall not be deemed exclusive and shall be in addition to
any other remedies permitted by law.
3. An agricultural producer who is aggrieved by a violation or violations under
sections 261.150 to 261.170 may seek injunctive relief or bring a civil action in any court
of competent jurisdiction for damages sustained as a consequence of the violation or
violations, together with the actual costs of the action, including reasonable attorney's
fees. A court may award the following to the prevailing party:

HB 3409 8
(1) Actual damages or statutory damages of up to ten thousand dollars per
violation, whichever is greater; and
(2) Reasonable attorney's fees and court costs.
261.166. 1. Sections 261.150 to 261.170 shall not be construed to:
(1) Preempt or conflict with applicable federal laws including, but not limited to,
the federal Copyright Act of 1976, Pub. L. No. 94-553, 17 U.S.C. Section 101 et seq., as
amended, federal patent law 35 U.S.C. Section 100 et seq., as amended, or trade secret
law 18 U.S.C. Section 1831 et seq., as amended;
(2) Require a data collector to divulge any trade secret defined under section
417.453 to any data owner or independent data service provider; or
(3) Be superseded by any private memorandum of understanding or similar
agreement between equipment manufacturers and agricultural associations unless such
memorandum provides protections at least as protective of agricultural producers as
those provided under sections 261.150 to 261.170.
261.168. The department shall have the authority to:
(1) Receive and investigate complaints relating to violations under sections
261.150 to 261.170; and
(2) Refer complaints to the attorney general's office for appropriate follow-up
action.
2. The department shall publish an annual report or reports by December
thirtieth of each year on agricultural data market concentration including, but not
limited to, moneys collected, complaints received, complaints referred to the attorney
general, civil actions filed, and other matters that are germane to the overall
effectiveness of complying with sections 261.150 to 261.170.
3. The department shall promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section including, but not limited to, the complaint process, forms
and related requirements. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
261.170. 1. Except as provided in sections 261.158 and 261.162, sections 261.150
to 261.170 shall become effective January 1, 2027.
2. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:

HB 3409 9
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under sections 261.150 to
261.170 shall sunset six years after the effective date of sections 261.150 to 261.170
unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly; and
(2) Sections 261.150 to 261.170 shall terminate on September first of the
calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized
under sections 261.150 to 261.170 is sunset.
3. Prior to the termination of the provisions of sections 261.150 to 261.170, the
department shall conduct a comprehensive review of the effectiveness of the Missouri
agricultural data ownership and market competition act and submit a report to the
general assembly with recommendations regarding the continuation, modification, or
repeal of sections 261.150 to 261.170.
✔